Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
CHAPTER 4 Garnishment Proceedings

Cross references.

Executions and judicial sales, T. 9, C. 13.

Use of garnishment to collect taxes, §

48-2-55

.

Garnishments, Uniform Rules for the Superior Courts of Georgia, Rule 15.1.

Editor’s notes.

Former Chapter 4, relating to garnishment proceedings, and consisting of Code Sections 18-4-1 through 18-4-135, was repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255, effective May 12, 2016. The former Chapter was based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 1608, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 159, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 634, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 783, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1769, §§ 1-8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 383, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 804, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 18; Ga. L. 1983, p. 454, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 683, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 370, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1319, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 18; Ga. L. 1985, p. 785, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1632, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 360, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 941, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1613, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 119, § 1/HB 149; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 2, §§ 1-17/HB 683; Ga. L. 2014, p. 482, §§ 7-9/SB 386.

Garnishment and orders to withhold and deliver, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Office of Child Support Recovery, Recovery and Administration of Child Support, § 290-7-1-.09.

Law reviews.

For article as to federal restrictions on garnishment, see 21 Mercer L. Rev. 495 (1970).

For article, “Garnishment Restrictions Under Federal Law,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 399 (1970).

For comment discussing due process problems with Georgia’s prejudgment procedures prior to the adoption of the 1976 Acts on garnishment, in light of Hall v. Stone,

229 Ga. 96

,

189 S.E.2d 403

(1972), see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 336 (1973).

For note discussing the constitutionality of former Georgia garnishment laws, see 28 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (1976).

For article critically analyzing the various elements constitutionally required for prejudgment seizure of a debtor’s property, focusing on § 9-503 of the U.C.C., see 28 Mercer L. Rev. 665 (1977).

For note discussing notice and judicial supervision in postjudgment garnishment in Georgia, see 26 Emory L.J. 597 (1977).

For note discussing intervention by defendants and third persons into garnishment proceedings, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For article on the 2016 enactment of this chapter, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 41 (2016).